California, session 20252026, AB310.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 124238.5 of the Health and Safety Code is amended to read:124238.5. (a) Commencing January 1, 2028, a youth sports organization that elects to offer an athletic program shall ensure that its athletes have access to an automated external defibrillator (AED) during any official practice or match, subject to subdivisions (b) and (c).(b) Commencing January 1, 2027, a youth sports organization shall ensure that its coaches are certified, and recertified at least every two years, to perform cardiopulmonary resuscitation and operate an AED and that there is a written cardiac emergency response plan. Certified training may be conducted in person or online and shall be offered by an accredited organization, consistent with national evidence-based cardiovascular care guidelines. The written cardiac emergency response plan shall be reviewed annually with coaches and staff. The written emergency response plan shall be consistent with nationally recognized, evidence-based standards and shall detail all of the following:(1) The location of any AEDs and procedures to be followed in the event of sudden cardiac arrest.(2) The responsibilities of the coach, administration, and athletes during the event.(3) How the coach, administration, and athletes will be notified and trained on the emergency response plan.(4) An annual electronic communication to the parents or guardians of enrolled participants that includes the cardiac emergency response plan or an internet link to the plan, the location or locations of any AEDs, and identifies the staff members designated to be notified in the event of a sudden cardiac event.(c) Commencing January 1, 2028, a youth sports organization shall ensure that its AED is maintained and tested according to the operation and maintenance guidelines established by the manufacturer of that AED and the applicable rules and regulations of the federal Food and Drug Administration or any other applicable state or federal authority.